Utah statutes.
31A-23a-103.   Requirement of license.

(1) (a)  Unless exempted from the licensing requirement under Section 31A-23a-201 or 31A-23a-207, a person may not perform, offer to perform, or advertise any service as a producer, limited line producer, customer service representative, consultant, managing general agent, or reinsurance intermediary in Utah, without a valid individual or agency license issued under this chapter.

(b)  A valid license includes at least one license type and one line of authority pertaining to that license type.

(c)  A person may not utilize the services of another as a producer, limited line producer, customer service representative, consultant, managing general agent, or reinsurance intermediary if that person knows or should know that the other does not have a license as required by law.

(2)  This part may not be construed to require an insurer to obtain an insurance producer license.

(3) An insurance contract is not invalid as a result of a violation of this section.

